Massachusetts, session 194th, S2030.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the following new
chapter:
Chapter 78B Literacy Tax Credit
Section 1. An Act to create a Literacy Tax Credit (LTC), under the Laws of
Massachusetts, providing for a Tax Credit, to certain qualified individuals, for specific assistance
in helping individuals to gain literacy; and/or full literacy.
Section 2. The quality of literacy, learning, and education, being the specific, and proper
concern of the Great and General Court since the 1630s, and 1640s, therefore, this Act is created
and established, in order that the literacy, and productive economy of the people as a whole, and
the many individuals of The Commonwealth, may be further improved.
of 3

Section 3. Many individuals, have some level of marginal literacy, but are otherwise
definable, as being functionally illiterate, lacking a full, comprehensive literacy. It is intended by
this legislation, to address, and reduce both complete illiteracy, and functional illiteracy, to the
benefit of such individuals, and our Commonwealth.
Section 4. Each person wishing to become literate, and/or fully literate, should be tested
for their level of literacy and competence, by reasonable standards to be established. Each
existing literate person, who wishes to participate in helping to improve literacy, can register
their willingness to do so, through various recognized educational organizations; including
properly accredited schools, and other appropriate organizations. Such organizations, may be
qualified, and designated through appropriate regulations by the Massachusetts Department of
Education.
Section 5. A Literacy Training Lesson Program (LTLP) shall be created. Any person
being brought to literacy through an ‘LTLP’ shall be recognized by a Literacy Certificate (LC).
The person helping to bring them to literacy, designated as a Literacy Sponsor (LS), shall be
rewarded at such point, by a Literacy Tax Credit (LTC) of no less than $750, and up to $2200,
such amount to be adjustable based on further analysis, and those standards, and regulations of
the Massachusetts Department of Education. These amounts may be adjusted from time to time,
as are modest, and reflect reasonable inflation standards such as the Consumer Price Index (CPI).
Section 6. Appropriate standards shall be set by the Massachusetts Department of
Education, identifying the standards to be used, in approving those individuals, who wish to
assist other individuals to become literate.
of 3

Section 7. Other relevant standards, and regulations, shall be established. Detailed
recording of the results of this program, shall be kept, regularly analyzed, and publicly made
available, so that the program may be measured, improved, and adjusted for effectiveness.
of 3